Massachusetts, session 194th, S1904.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition is
hereby amended by inserting, in Group 2, after the words “employees of Cushing hospital” the
following:- “Veterans agent or part time Veterans agent as defined by Section 1 MGL, Ch. 115”.
of 1